Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-754
Interrelated Water Management Plan Program; created; grants; commission; duties; use.

The Interrelated Water Management Plan Program is created for the purpose of facilitating and funding the duties of districts arising under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act. The program shall function as a grant program administered by the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission and the Chief Water Officer upon recommendations of the commission using funds appropriated for the program. The commission shall develop guidelines and limitations for grant requests for funding such district's duties, including studies required to carry out those duties. Grant requests shall be made to the commission for review in a manner and form prescribed by the commission. The amounts requested and approved shall be supported by a minimum local revenue match comprising twenty percent of the total project cost. The Chief Water Officer shall expend funds to implement the commission's recommendations for fiscal support under the program only upon the commission's approval.

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 246.